Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-230
Operation without license; public nuisance; penalties.

No person, except a licensed organization or qualifying nonprofit organization operating pursuant to the Nebraska Bingo Act, shall conduct any game of bingo for which a charge is made, and no person except a licensed organization shall award any prize with a value in excess of fifty dollars for any bingo game. Any such game conducted in violation of this section is hereby declared to be a public nuisance. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class I misdemeanor for the second or subsequent offense.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 48;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 44;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-171;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 31;

Laws 1988, LB 295, § 16;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 31;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 14.
July 1, 2026